Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB750.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 218A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or
research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or by his or her authorized agent under his or her immediate
supervision and pursuant to his or her order; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the
practitioner;
(2) "Anabolic steroid" means any drug or hormonal substance chemically and
pharmacologically related to testosterone that promotes muscle growth and includes
those substances classified as Schedule III controlled substances pursuant to KRS
218A.020 but does not include estrogens, progestins, and anticosteroids;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(4) "Carfentanil" means any substance containing any quantity of carfentanil, or any of
its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(5) "Certified community based palliative care program" means a palliative care
program which has received certification from the Joint Commission;
(6) "Child" means any person under the age of majority as specified in KRS 2.015;
(7) "Cocaine" means a substance containing any quantity of cocaine, its salts, optical
and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(8) "Controlled substance" means methamphetamine, or a drug, substance, or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V and includes a controlled substance
analogue;
(9) [(a) ]"Controlled substance analogue[,]":
Page 1 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(a) [Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, ]Means a substance:
1. The chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; and
2. Which has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; or
3. With respect to a particular person, which such person represents or
intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; and[.]
(b) [Such term ]Does not include:
1. Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application;
2. With respect to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in
effect for investigational use for that person pursuant to federal law to
the extent conduct with respect to such substance is pursuant to such
exemption; or
3. Any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before
the exemption described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph takes
effect with respect to that substance;
(10) "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance which, or the container or
labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other
identifying mark, imprint, number, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a
manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance;
(11) "Cychlorphine" means a substance containing any quantity of cychlorphine, or
Page 2 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
any of its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(12) "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research
subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the packaging,
labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery;
(13)[(12)] "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a Schedule II, III, IV, or
V controlled substance to or for the use of an ultimate user;
(14)[(13)] "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a
controlled substance;
(15)[(14)] "Dosage unit" means a single pill, capsule, ampule, liquid, or other form of
administration available as a single unit;
(16)[(15)] "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia,
official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National
Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, care, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of
the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in this
subsection.
It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories;
(17)[(16)] "Fentanyl" means a substance containing any quantity of fentanyl, or any of
its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(18)[(17)] "Fentanyl derivative" means a substance containing any quantity of any
chemical compound, except compounds specifically scheduled as controlled
substances by statute or by administrative regulation pursuant to this chapter, which
is structurally derived from 1-ethyl-4-(N-phenylamido) piperadine:
Page 3 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(a) By substitution:
1. At the 2-position of the 1-ethyl group with a phenyl, furan, thiophene, or
ethyloxotetrazole ring system; and
2. Of the terminal amido hydrogen atom with an alkyl, alkoxy, cycloalkyl,
or furanyl group; and
(b) Which may be further modified in one (1) or more of the following ways:
1. By substitution on the N-phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy,
haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents;
2. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with alkyl, allyl,
alkoxy, hydroxy, or halide substituents at the 2-, 3-, 5-, and/or 6-
positions;
3. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with a phenyl,
alkoxy, or carboxylate ester substituent at the 4- position; or
4. By substitution on the 1-ethyl group to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, or
hydroxy substituents;
(19)[(18)] "Good-faith prior examination," [as used in KRS Chapter 218A and ]for
criminal prosecution only, means an in-person medical examination of the patient
conducted by the prescribing practitioner or other health-care professional routinely
relied upon in the ordinary course of his or her practice, at which time the patient is
physically examined and a medical history of the patient is obtained. "In-person"
includes telehealth examinations. This subsection shall not be applicable to hospice
providers licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B;
(20)[(19)] "Hazardous chemical substance" includes any chemical substance used or
intended for use in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in
this section or the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine as defined in KRS
218A.1431, which:
(a) Poses an explosion hazard;
Page 4 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(b) Poses a fire hazard; or
(c) Is poisonous or injurious if handled, swallowed, or inhaled;
(21)[(20)] "Heroin" means a substance containing any quantity of heroin, or any of its
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(22)[(21)] "Hydrocodone combination product" means a drug with:
(a) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an
isoquinoline alkaloid of opium; or
(b) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(23)[(22)] "Immediate precursor" means a substance which is the principal compound
commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical
intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance
or methamphetamine, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
manufacture;
(24)[(23)] "Industrial hemp" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.850;
(25)[(24)] "Industrial hemp products" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.850;
(26)[(25)] "Intent to manufacture" means any evidence which demonstrates a person's
conscious objective to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine.
Such evidence includes but is not limited to statements and a chemical substance's
usage, quantity, manner of storage, or proximity to other chemical substances or
equipment used to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine;
(27)[(26)] "Isomer" means the optical isomer, except the cabinet[ for Health and Family
Services] may include the optical, positional, or geometric isomer to classify any
Page 5 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
substance pursuant to KRS 218A.020;
(28)[(27)] "Manufacture," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means the production,
preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled
substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural
origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of
the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container except that this term does not
include activities:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her administering or dispensing of a
controlled substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(b) By a practitioner, or by his or her authorized agent under his or her
supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or
chemical analysis and not for sale; or
(c) By a pharmacist as an incident to his or her dispensing of a controlled
substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(29)[(28)] "Marijuana" means all parts of the plant Cannabis sp., whether growing or
not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every
compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its
seeds or resin or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of these substances. The term "marijuana" does not include:
(a) Industrial hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person who
holds a license issued by the Department of Agriculture permitting that person
to cultivate, handle, or process industrial hemp;
(b) Industrial hemp products that do not include any living plants, viable seeds,
leaf materials, or floral materials;
(c) The substance cannabidiol, when transferred, dispensed, or administered
pursuant to the written order of a physician practicing at a hospital or
Page 6 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
associated clinic affiliated with a Kentucky public university having a college
or school of medicine;
(d) For persons participating in a clinical trial or in an expanded access program,
a drug or substance approved for the use of those participants by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(e) A cannabidiol product derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS
260.850;
(f) For the purpose of conducting scientific research, a cannabinoid product
derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS 260.850;
(g) A cannabinoid product approved as a prescription medication by the United
States Food and Drug Administration; or
(h) Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(30)[(29)] "Medical history," [as used in KRS Chapter 218A and ]for criminal
prosecution only, means an accounting of a patient's medical background, including
but not limited to prior medical conditions, prescriptions, and family background;
(31)[(30)] "Medical order," [as used in KRS Chapter 218A and ]for criminal prosecution
only, means a lawful order of a specifically identified practitioner for a specifically
identified patient for the patient's health-care needs. "Medical order" may or may
not include a prescription drug order;
(32)[(31)] "Medical record," [as used in KRS Chapter 218A and ]for criminal
prosecution only, means a record, other than for financial or billing purposes,
relating to a patient, kept by a practitioner as a result of the practitioner-patient
relationship;
(33)[(32)] "Methamphetamine" means any substance that contains any quantity of
methamphetamine, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(34)[(33)] "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by
Page 7 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical
synthesis:
(a) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of
opium or opiate;
(b) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is
chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids
of opium;
(c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been
removed;
(e) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(f) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; and
(g) Any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of any of
the substances referred to in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection;
(35)[(34)] "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-
sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug
having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include,
unless specifically designated as controlled under KRS 218A.020, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts
(dextromethorphan). It does include its racemic and levorotatory forms;
(36)[(35)] "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species papaver somniferum L., except
its seeds;
(37)[(36)] "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental
subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any
other legal entity;
Page 8 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(38)[(37)] "Physical injury" has the same meaning as[it has] in KRS 500.080;
(39)[(38)] "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after
mowing;
(40)[(39)] "Pharmacist" means a natural person licensed by this state to engage in the
practice of the profession of pharmacy;
(41)[(40)] "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, scientific
investigator, optometrist as authorized in KRS 320.240, advanced practice
registered nurse as authorized under KRS 314.011, physician assistant as authorized
under KRS 311.858, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted by
state or federal law to acquire, distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to,
or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this state. "Practitioner" also includes a physician, dentist, podiatrist,
veterinarian, or advanced practice registered nurse authorized under KRS 314.011
who is a resident of and actively practicing in a state other than Kentucky and who
is licensed and has prescriptive authority for controlled substances under the
professional licensing laws of another state, unless the person's Kentucky license
has been revoked, suspended, restricted, or probated, in which case the terms of the
Kentucky license shall prevail;
(42)[(41)] "Practitioner-patient relationship," [as used in KRS Chapter 218A and ]for
criminal prosecution only, means a medical relationship that exists between a
patient and a practitioner or the practitioner's designee, after the practitioner or his
or her designee has conducted at least one (1) good-faith prior examination;
(43)[(42)] "Prescription" means a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug or
medicine, or combination or mixture of drugs or medicines, or proprietary
preparation, signed or given or authorized by a medical, dental, chiropody,
veterinarian, optometric practitioner, or advanced practice registered nurse, and
intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
Page 9 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
disease in man or other animals;
(44)[(43)] "Prescription blank," with reference to a controlled substance, means a
document that meets the requirements of KRS 218A.204 and 217.216;
(45)[(44)] "Presumptive probation" means a sentence of probation not to exceed the
maximum term specified for the offense, subject to conditions otherwise authorized
by law, that is presumed to be the appropriate sentence for certain offenses
designated in this chapter, notwithstanding contrary provisions of KRS Chapter
533. That presumption shall only be overcome by a finding on the record by the
sentencing court of substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant cannot be
safely and effectively supervised in the community, is not amenable to community-
based treatment, or poses a significant risk to public safety;
(46)[(45)] "Production" includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or
harvesting of a controlled substance;
(47)[(46)] "Recovery program" means an evidence-based, nonclinical service that assists
individuals and families working toward sustained recovery from substance use and
other criminal risk factors. This can be done through an array of support programs
and services that are delivered through residential and nonresidential means;
(48)[(47)] "Salvia" means Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A and includes all parts of the
plant presently classified botanically as Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not,
the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of that plant, and every compound,
manufacture, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its seeds, or its
extracts, including salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of
such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation of that plant, its seeds, or extracts. The term shall not include any other
species in the genus salvia;
(49)[(48)] "Second or subsequent offense" means that for the purposes of this chapter an
offense is considered as a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his or her
Page 10 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this
chapter, or under any statute of the United States, or of any state relating to
substances classified as controlled substances or counterfeit substances, except that
a prior conviction for a nontrafficking offense shall be treated as a prior offense
only when the subsequent offense is a nontrafficking offense. For the purposes of
this section, a conviction voided under KRS 218A.275 or 218A.276 shall not
constitute a conviction under this chapter;
(50)[(49)] "Sell" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person for
consideration or in furtherance of commercial distribution;
(51)[(50)] "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning as[it has] in KRS 500.080;
(52)[(51)] "Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines" means any chemical compound
which is not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if
approved, which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal
law, that contains Benzylpiperazine (BZP); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine
(TFMPP); 1,1-Dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxytetrahydrocannabinol (HU-210); 1-
Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; dexanabinol (HU-
211); or any compound in the following structural classes:
(a) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-081, JWH-
122, JWH-200, and AM-2201;
(b) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
Page 11 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8;
(c) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), and
RCS-4;
(d) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the
phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to CP 47,497 and
its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);
(e) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-
naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-175, JWH-184, and JWH-185;
Page 12 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(f) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and JWH-368;
(g) Naphthylmethylindenes: Any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethyl)indene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the
indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-176;
(h) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and
whether or not further substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any
extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to UR-144
and XLR-11;
(i) Adamantoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
Page 13 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
the adamantyl ring system to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to AB-001 and AM-1248; or
(j) Any other synthetic cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law;
(53)[(52)] "Synthetic cathinones" means any chemical compound which is not approved
by the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law (not including
bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule) structurally derived from
2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl,
or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in one
(1) or more of the following ways:
(a) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy,
alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further
substituted in the ring system by one (1) or more other univalent substituents.
Examples of this class include but are not limited to 3,4-
Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA);
(b) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent. Examples
of this class include but are not limited to 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-
one (buphedrone);
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or
methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a
cyclic structure. Examples of this class include but are not limited to
Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and -Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (-PPP);
or
(d) Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed
Page 14 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
in accordance with state or federal law;
(54)[(53)] "Synthetic drugs" means any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any
synthetic cathinones;
(55)[(54)] "Telehealth" has the same meaning as[it has] in KRS 211.332;
(56)[(55)] "Tetrahydrocannabinols" means synthetic equivalents of the substances
contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of the plant Cannabis, sp. or
synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure
and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(a) Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;
(b) Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; and
(c) Delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(57)[(56)] "Traffic," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means to manufacture,
distribute, dispense, sell, transfer, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute,
dispense, or sell a controlled substance;
(58)[(57)] "Transfer" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person
without consideration and not in furtherance of commercial distribution; and
(59)[(58)] "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance
for his or her own use or for the use of a member of his or her household or for
administering to an animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her
household.
Section 2. KRS 218A.1410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of importing heroin, carfentanil, cychlorphine, fentanyl, or
fentanyl derivatives when he or she knowingly and unlawfully transports any
quantity of heroin, carfentanil, cychlorphine, fentanyl, or fentanyl derivatives into
the Commonwealth by any means with the intent to sell or distribute the heroin,
carfentanil, cychlorphine, fentanyl, or fentanyl derivatives.
(2) The provisions of this section are intended to be a separate offense from others in
Page 15 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
this chapter, and shall be punished in addition to violations of this chapter occurring
during the same course of conduct.
(3) (a) Importing heroin is a Class C felony, and the defendant shall not be released
on probation, shock probation, conditional discharge, or parole until he or she
has served at least fifty percent (50%) of the sentence imposed.
(b) Importing carfentanil, cychlorphine, fentanyl, or fentanyl derivatives is a
Class C felony, and the defendant shall not be:
1. [Shall not be ]Eligible for pretrial diversion; or[and]
2. [Shall not be ]Released on probation, shock probation, conditional
discharge, [or ]parole, or other form of early release until he or she has
served at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence imposed.
Section 3. KRS 218A.1412 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in a controlled substance in the first degree when
he or she knowingly and unlawfully traffics in:
(a) Four (4) grams or more of cocaine;
(b) Two (2) grams or more of methamphetamine;
(c) Ten (10) or more dosage units of a controlled substance that is classified in
Schedules I or II and is a narcotic drug, or a controlled substance analogue;
(d) Any quantity of heroin, cychlorphine, fentanyl, carfentanil, or fentanyl
derivatives; lysergic acid diethylamide; phencyclidine; gamma
hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), including its salts, isomers, salts of isomers, and
analogues; or flunitrazepam, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
or
(e) Any quantity of a controlled substance specified in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection in an amount less than the amounts specified in those
paragraphs.
(2) The amounts specified in subsection (1) of this section may occur in a single
Page 16 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
transaction or may occur in a series of transactions over a period of time not to
exceed ninety (90) days that cumulatively result in the quantities specified in this
section.
(3) (a) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of
this section shall be guilty of a Class C felony for the first offense and a Class
B felony for a second or subsequent offense.
(b) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(e) of this section
shall be guilty of a Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony
for a second or subsequent offense.
(c) If the substance is cychlorphine, fentanyl, or a fentanyl derivative, and the
injection, ingestion, inhalation, or other introduction of the cychlorphine,
fentanyl, or fentanyl derivative causes the death of a person, the penalty for
the offense shall be one (1) level higher than the level otherwise specified in
this section.
(d) Any person convicted of a Class C felony offense or higher under this section
shall not be released on probation, shock probation, parole, conditional
discharge, or other form of early release until he or she has served at least fifty
percent (50%) of the sentence imposed in cases where the trafficked substance
was heroin, cychlorphine, fentanyl, carfentanil, or fentanyl derivatives.
Section 4. KRS 218A.14141 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in a misrepresented controlled substance when he
or she knowingly and unlawfully sells or distributes any Schedule I controlled
substance, carfentanil, cychlorphine, or fentanyl while misrepresenting the identity
of the Schedule I controlled substance, carfentanil, cychlorphine, or fentanyl being
sold or distributed as a legitimate pharmaceutical product.
(2) The provisions of this section are intended to be a separate offense from others in
this chapter, and shall be punished in addition to violations of this chapter occurring
Page 17 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
during the same course of conduct.
(3) Trafficking in a misrepresented controlled substance is a Class D felony.
Section 5. KRS 218A.142 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of aggravated trafficking in a controlled substance in the first
degree when he or she knowingly and unlawfully traffics in:
(a) One hundred (100) grams or more of heroin;
(b) Twenty-eight (28) grams or more of fentanyl;[ or]
(c) Ten (10) grams or more of cychlorphine; or
(d) Ten (10) grams or more of carfentanil or fentanyl derivatives.
(2) Aggravated trafficking in a controlled substance in the first degree is a Class B
felony, and:
(a) The defendant shall not be released on probation, shock probation, conditional
discharge, [or ]parole, or other form of early release until he or she has
served at least fifty percent (50%) of the sentence imposed where the
trafficked substance was heroin; or
(b) The defendant shall not be eligible for pretrial diversion, and shall not be
released on probation, shock probation, conditional discharge, [or ]parole, or
other form of early release until he or she has served at least eighty-five
percent (85%) of the sentence imposed where the trafficked substance was
fentanyl, carfentanil, cychlorphine, or fentanyl derivatives.
Section 6. KRS 500.080 is amended to read as follows:
As used in the Kentucky Penal Code, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Actor" means any natural person and, where relevant, a corporation or an
unincorporated association;
(2) "Crime" means a misdemeanor or a felony;
(3) "Cychlorphine" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(4) "Dangerous instrument" means any instrument, including parts of the human body
Page 18 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
when a serious physical injury is a direct result of the use of that part of the human
body, article, or substance which, under the circumstances in which it is used,
attempted to be used, or threatened to be used, is readily capable of causing death or
serious physical injury. "Dangerous instrument" may include a laser;
(5)[(4)] "Deadly weapon" means any of the following:
(a) A weapon of mass destruction;
(b) Any weapon from which a shot, readily capable of producing death or other
serious physical injury, may be discharged;
(c) Any knife other than an ordinary pocket knife or hunting knife;
(d) Billy, nightstick, or club;
(e) Blackjack or slapjack;
(f) Nunchaku karate sticks;
(g) Shuriken or death star; or
(h) Artificial knuckles made from metal, plastic, or other similar hard material;
(6)[(5)] "Felony" means an offense for which a sentence to a term of imprisonment of
at least one (1) year in the custody of the Department of Corrections may be
imposed;
(7) "Fentanyl" has the same meaning as in Section 1 of this Act;
(8)[(6)] "Fentanyl derivative" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.010;
(9)[(7)] "Government" means the United States, any state, county, municipality, or
other political unit, or any department, agency, or subdivision of any of the
foregoing, or any corporation or other association carrying out the functions of
government;
(10)[(8)] "He" or "she" means any natural person and, where relevant, a corporation or
an unincorporated association;
(11)[(9)] "Impacted by the disaster" means the location or in reasonable proximity to
the location where a natural or man-made disaster has caused physical injury,
Page 19 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
serious physical injury, death, or substantial damage to property or infrastructure;
(12)[(10)] "Laser" means any device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic
radiation by stimulated emission that emits a beam, other than a medical laser when
used in medical treatment or surgery;
(13)[(11)] "Law" includes statutes, ordinances, and properly adopted regulatory
provisions. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, "law" also includes the
common law;
(14)[(12)] "Minor" means any person who has not reached the age of majority as defined
in KRS 2.015;
(15)[(13)] "Misdemeanor" means an offense, other than a traffic infraction, for which a
sentence to a term of imprisonment of not more than twelve (12) months can be
imposed;
(16)[(14)] "Natural or man-made disaster" means a tornado, storm, or other severe
weather, earthquake, flood, or fire that poses a significant threat to human health
and safety, property, or critical infrastructure;
(17)[(15)] "Offense" means conduct for which a sentence to a term of imprisonment or
to a fine is provided by any law of this state or by any law, local law, or ordinance
of a political subdivision of this state or by any law, order, rule, or regulation of any
governmental instrumentality authorized by law to adopt the same;
(18)[(16)] "Person" means a human being, and where appropriate, a public or private
corporation, an unincorporated association, a partnership, a government, or a
governmental authority;
(19)[(17)] "Physical injury" means substantial physical pain or any impairment of
physical condition;
(20)[(18)] "Possession" means to have actual physical possession or otherwise to
exercise actual dominion or control over a tangible object;
(21)[(19)] "Serious physical injury" means physical injury which creates a substantial
Page 20 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
risk of death, or which causes serious and prolonged disfigurement, prolonged
impairment of health, prolonged loss or impairment of the function of any bodily
organ, or eye damage or visual impairment. For a child twelve (12) years of age or
less at the time of the injury, or for any person if the relationship between the
perpetrator and the victim meets the definition of a family member or member of an
unmarried couple as defined in KRS 403.720, or a dating relationship as defined in
KRS 456.010, a serious physical injury includes but is not limited to the following:
(a) Bruising near the eyes, or on the head, neck, or lower back overlying the
kidneys;
(b) Any bruising severe enough to cause underlying muscle damage as
determined by elevated creatine kinase levels in the blood;
(c) Any bruising or soft tissue injury to the genitals that affects the ability to
urinate or defecate;
(d) Any testicular injury sufficient to put fertility at risk;
(e) Any burn near the eyes or involving the mouth, airway, or esophagus;
(f) Any burn deep enough to leave scarring or dysfunction of the body;
(g) Any burn requiring hospitalization, debridement in the operating room, IV
fluids, intubation, or admission to a hospital's intensive care unit;
(h) Rib fracture;
(i) Scapula or sternum fractures;
(j) Any broken bone that requires surgery;
(k) Head injuries that result in intracranial bleeding, skull fracture, or brain
injury;
(l) A concussion that results in the child becoming limp, unresponsive, or results
in seizure activity;
(m) Abdominal injuries that indicate internal organ damage regardless of whether
surgery is required;
Page 21 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(n) Any injury requiring surgery;
(o) Any injury that requires a blood transfusion; and
(p) Any injury requiring admission to a hospital's critical care unit;
(22)[(20)] "Unlawful" means contrary to law or, where the context so requires, not
permitted by law. It does not mean wrongful or immoral;
(23)[(21)] "Violation" means an offense, other than a traffic infraction, for which a
sentence to a fine only can be imposed; and
(24)[(22)] "Weapon of mass destruction" means:
(a) Any destructive device as defined in KRS 237.030, but not fireworks as
defined in KRS 227.700;
(b) Any weapon that is designed or intended to cause death or serious physical
injury through the release, dissemination, or impact of toxic or poisonous
chemicals or their precursors;
(c) Any weapon involving a disease organism; or
(d) Any weapon that is designed to release radiation or radioactivity at a level
dangerous to human life.
Section 7. KRS 507.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the first degree when:
(a) With intent to cause serious physical injury to another person, he or she
causes the death of such person or of a third person;
(b) With intent to cause the death of another person, he or she causes the death of
such person or of a third person under circumstances which do not constitute
murder because he or she acts under the influence of extreme emotional
disturbance, as defined in subsection (1)(a) of KRS 507.020;
(c) Through circumstances not otherwise constituting the offense of murder, he or
she intentionally abuses another person or knowingly permits another person
of whom he or she has actual custody to be abused and thereby causes death
Page 22 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
to a person twelve (12) years of age or less, or who is physically helpless or
mentally helpless; or
(d) He or she knowingly sells cychlorphine, fentanyl, or a fentanyl derivative to
another person, and the injection, ingestion, inhalation, or other introduction
of the cychlorphine, fentanyl, or fentanyl derivative causes the death of the
person.
(2) Manslaughter in the first degree is a Class B felony.
Section 8. KRS 507.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the second degree when he or she wantonly
causes the death of another person, including but not limited to situations where the
death results from the person's:
(a) Operation of a motor vehicle;
(b) Leaving a child under the age of eight (8) years in a motor vehicle under
circumstances which manifest an extreme indifference to human life and
which create a grave risk of death to the child, thereby causing the death of
the child;
(c) Unlawful distribution for remuneration of a Schedule I or II controlled
substance when the controlled substance is the proximate cause of death; or
(d) Knowing distribution of cychlorphine, fentanyl, or a fentanyl derivative to
another person without remuneration, and the injection, ingestion, inhalation,
or other introduction of the cychlorphine, fentanyl, or fentanyl derivative
causes the death of the person.
(2) Manslaughter in the second degree is a Class C felony.
Section 9. KRS 520.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of promoting contraband in the first degree when:
(a) He or she knowingly introduces dangerous contraband into a detention facility
or a penitentiary; or
Page 23 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(b) Being a person confined in a detention facility or a penitentiary, he or she
knowingly makes, obtains, or possesses dangerous contraband.
(2) Promoting contraband in the first degree is a Class D felony, unless the dangerous
contraband is cychlorphine, fentanyl, carfentanil, or a fentanyl derivative, in which
case it is a Class C felony.
Section 10. KRS 532.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "jail" means a "jail" or "regional jail" as defined in KRS
441.005.
(2) When an indeterminate term of imprisonment is imposed, the court shall commit
the defendant to the custody of the Department of Corrections for the term of his or
her sentence and until released in accordance with the law.
(3) When a definite term of imprisonment is imposed, the court shall commit the
defendant to a jail for the term of his or her sentence and until released in
accordance with the law.
(4) When a sentence of death is imposed, the court shall commit the defendant to the
custody of the Department of Corrections with directions that the sentence be
carried out according to law.
(5) (a) The provisions of KRS 500.080(6)[(5)] notwithstanding, if a Class D felon is
sentenced to an indeterminate term of imprisonment of five (5) years or less,
he or she shall serve that term in a jail in a county in which the fiscal court has
agreed to house state prisoners; except that, when an indeterminate sentence
of two (2) years or more is imposed on a Class D felon convicted of a sexual
offense enumerated in KRS 197.410(1), or a crime under KRS 17.510(12) or
(13), the sentence shall be served in a state institution. Counties choosing not
to comply with the provisions of this paragraph shall be granted a waiver by
the commissioner of the Department of Corrections.
(b) The provisions of KRS 500.080(6)[(5)] notwithstanding, a Class D felon who
Page 24 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
received a sentence of more than five (5) years for nonviolent, nonsexual
offenses, but who currently has less than five (5) years remaining to be
served, may serve the remainder of his or her term in a jail in a county in
which the fiscal court has agreed to house state prisoners.
(c) 1. The provisions of KRS 500.080(6)[(5)] notwithstanding, and except as
provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, a Class C or D felon with
a sentence of more than five (5) years who is classified by the
Department of Corrections as community custody shall serve that term
in a jail in a county in which the fiscal court has agreed to house state
prisoners if:
a. Beds are available in the jail;
b. State facilities are at capacity; and
c. Halfway house beds are being utilized at the contract level as of
July 15, 2000.
2. When an indeterminate sentence of two (2) years or more is imposed on
a felon convicted of a sex crime, as defined in KRS 17.500, or any
similar offense in another jurisdiction, the sentence shall be served in a
state institution.
3. Counties choosing not to comply with the provisions of this paragraph
shall be granted a waiver by the commissioner of the Department of
Corrections.
(d) Any jail that houses state inmates under this subsection shall offer programs
as recommended by the Jail Standards Commission. The Department of
Corrections shall adopt the recommendations of the Jail Standards
Commission and promulgate administrative regulations establishing required
programs for a jail that houses state inmates under this subsection. The
Department of Corrections shall approve programming offered by jails to state
Page 25 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
inmates for sentencing credits in accordance with KRS 197.045.
(e) Before housing any female state inmate, a jail shall be certified pursuant to
KRS 197.020.
(f) 1. a. If a jail is at or over one hundred fifty percent (150%) capacity, the
Department of Corrections may direct the jail to transfer a
specified number of state prisoners to vacant beds at other
designated jails or state institutions. As used in this paragraph,
"capacity" means the capacity listed on the certificate of
occupancy issued each year to the jail by the Department of
Corrections.
b. The Department of Corrections shall choose which state prisoners
are eligible for transfer based on the security level of the vacant
bed at the receiving jail or state institution.
c. State prisoners who are approved for transfer to a Department of
Corrections facility for necessary medical treatment and care
pursuant to KRS 441.560 shall not be transferred to another jail.
d. State prisoners enrolled in a Department of Corrections approved
program pursuant to KRS 197.045 shall not be transferred.
e. State prisoners awaiting trial in the county they are being housed
shall not be transferred.
f. Jails that receive state prisoners pursuant to this subparagraph shall
be responsible for the transportation of those prisoners to the jail.
2. If the Department of Corrections directs the transfer of a state prisoner
pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the jailer has fourteen
(14) days to transfer the state prisoner. If the jailer refuses to release
custody of the state prisoner to the receiving jail within fourteen (14)
days, the department shall reduce the per diem for the jail for an amount
Page 26 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
equal to the per diem of that prisoner for each day the jailer refuses to
comply with the direction.
3. If the Department of Corrections directs the transfer of a state prisoner
pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph, the jailer of the receiving
jail shall accept the transfer and transport the state prisoner in
accordance with subparagraph 1.f. of this paragraph. If, after receiving a
copy of the direction, the jailer refuses to accept and transport the state
prisoner, the Department of Corrections shall reduce the per diem for the
receiving jail for an amount equal to the per diem of that prisoner for
each day the jailer refuses to comply with the direction.
4. If a jail has a vacant bed and has a Class C or Class D felon who, based
on the Department of Corrections classification system, is eligible to be
housed in that vacant bed, the department may direct the jail to transfer
the state prisoner to that bed. If the jailer refuses to transfer the state
prisoner to the vacant bed, the Department of Corrections shall reduce
the per diem for the jail for an amount equal to the per diem of that
prisoner for each day the jailer refuses to comply with the direction.
5. The per diem reduced pursuant to subparagraph 2., 3., or 4. of this
paragraph shall be enforced by withholding the amount from the per
diem paid to the jail pursuant to KRS 431.215(2).
6. If a jail that is at or over one hundred fifty percent (150%) capacity
requests the transfer of a specified number of state prisoners, the
Department of Corrections may, if vacant beds are available at other
jails, direct the transfer in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph.
(g) If a jail has vacant beds in an area of the jail usually reserved for state
prisoners, the jail may house county prisoners in that area.
Page 27 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(6) The jailer of a county in which a Class D felon or a Class C felon is incarcerated
may request the commissioner of the Department of Corrections to incarcerate the
felon in a state corrections institution if the jailer has reasons to believe that the
felon is an escape risk, a danger to himself or herself or other inmates, an extreme
security risk, or needs protective custody beyond that which can be provided in a
jail. The commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall evaluate the request
and transfer the inmate if he or she deems it necessary. If the commissioner refuses
to accept the felon inmate, and the Circuit Judge of the county that has jurisdiction
of the offense charged is of the opinion that the felon cannot be safely kept in a jail,
the Circuit Judge, with the consent of the Governor, may order the felon transferred
to the custody of the Department of Corrections.
(7) (a) Class D felons and Class C felons serving their time in a jail shall be
considered state prisoners, and, except as provided in subsection (5)(f) of this
section, the Department of Corrections shall pay the jail in which the prisoner
is incarcerated a per diem amount determined according to KRS 431.215(2).
For other state prisoners and parole violator prisoners, the per diem payments
shall also begin on the date prescribed in KRS 431.215(2), except as provided
in subsection (5)(f) of this section.
(b) 1. The per diem amount paid to the jail shall be increased by two dollars
($2) per day of program attendance for those inmates enrolled in and
attending evidence-based programs approved by the department and that
do not require instructors to have completed any postsecondary
education.
2. The per diem amount paid to the jail shall be increased by ten dollars
($10) per day of program attendance for those inmates enrolled in and
attending evidence-based programs approved by the department and that
require instructors to have completed particular postsecondary courses.
Page 28 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
(c) Any amount beyond the base per diem paid under paragraph (a) of this
subsection that is paid under a contract to the jail for an inmate's attendance at
an evidence-based program shall be credited toward the ten dollars ($10)
increase in per diem required under paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(8) State prisoners, excluding the Class D felons and Class C felons qualifying to serve
time in jails, shall be transferred to the state institution within forty-five (45) days
of final sentencing.
(9) (a) Class D felons eligible for placement in a jail may be permitted by the warden
or jailer to participate in any approved community work program or other
form of work release with the approval of the commissioner of the
Department of Corrections.
(b) The authority to release an inmate to work under this subsection may be
exercised at any time during the inmate's sentence, including the period when
the court has concurrent authority to permit work release pursuant to KRS
439.265.
(c) The warden or jailer may require an inmate participating in the program to
pay a fee to reimburse the warden or jailer for the cost of operating the
community work program or any other work release program. The fee shall
not exceed the lesser of fifty-five dollars ($55) per week or twenty percent
(20%) of the prisoner's weekly net pay earned from the community work
program or work release participation. In addition, the inmate may be required
to pay for any drug testing performed on the inmate as a requirement of the
community work program or work release participation.
(d) This subsection shall not apply to an inmate who:
1. Is not eligible for work release pursuant to KRS 197.140;
2. Has a maximum or close security classification as defined by
administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of
Page 29 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2335
Corrections;
3. Is subject to the provisions of KRS 532.043; or
4. Is in a reentry center as defined in KRS 441.005.
Page 30 of 30
XXXX 2/25/2026 12:53 PM Jacketed